Massachusetts, session 194th, H2795.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (s) of subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 414, the figure
“4” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- “10”.
of 1